Maryland, session 2025, HB0087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
SUBTITLE 3. SHORT–TERM RENTALS AND HOME AMENITY RENTALS.
15–301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “HOME AMENITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(C) “HOME AMENITY RENTAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(D) (1) “RENTAL INTERMEDIARY” MEANS A PERSON, OTHER THAN THE
OWNER, WHO FACILITATES THE SALE OR USE OF A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR
HOME AMENITY AND CHARGES A BUYER THE TAXABLE PRICE FOR THE SHORT–TERM
RENTAL OR HOME AMENITY RENTAL.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON SHALL BE
CONSIDERED TO FACILITATE THE SALE OR USE OF A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR
HOME AMENITY IF THE PERSON BROKERS, COORDINATES, OR IN ANY OTHER WAY
ARRANGES FOR THE SALE OR USE OF A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR HOME
AMENITY BY A BUYER.
(E) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 87 3
(F) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101
OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
15–302.
(A) A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR HOME AMENITY IS:
(1) SUBJECT TO THE HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE
ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE
(EVACUATION PROCEDURES IN CASE OF FIRE);
(2) A PROPERTY OR A PORTION OF A PROPERTY IN WHICH A PRIVATE
PLACE MAY BE LOCATED FOR PURPOSES OF § 3–902 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE (VISUAL SURVEILLANCE WITH PRURIENT INTENT); AND
(3) A PUBLIC PLACE FOR PURPOSES OF § 10–201 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE (DISTURBING THE PUBLIC PEACE AND DISORDERLY CONDUCT).
(B) IN ADDITION TO COMPLYING WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR HOME AMENITY SHALL BE IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE HEALTH AND SAFETY PROVISIONS THAT THE COUNTY AND
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IMPOSE ON HOTELS OR SIMILAR AMENITIES LOCATED IN
THE SAME JURISDICTION.
(C) THE RENTAL INTERMEDIARY SHALL PROVIDE THE OWNER OF THE
SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR HOME AMENITY WITH THE NECESSARY FUNDS TO
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
15–303.
THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING
BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY ADOPT RULES OR
REGULATIONS, BY RESOLUTION OR ORDINANCE, RELATING TO HIGH–INTENSITY USE
OF SHORT–TERM RENTALS IN AREAS LACKING AN ADEQUATE SUPPLY OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING, INCLUDING A RULE OR REGULATION THAT DEFINES A
HIGH–INTENSITY USE OF SHORT–TERM RENTALS BASED ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF NIGHTS BOOKED;
(2) INFRASTRUCTURE CONSTRAINTS IN THE AREA SURROUNDING
THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNITS;

HOUSE BILL 87
(3) WHETHER THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNITS ARE
OWNER–OCCUPIED;
(4) CRITERIA TO IDENTIFY AREAS LACKING AN ADEQUATE SUPPLY OF
AFFORDABLE HOUSING; AND
(5) ANY OTHER CRITERIA RELATING TO SHORT–TERM RENTALS.
15–304.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, EACH OWNER OF A
SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OR HOME AMENITY SHALL REPORT TO THE
COMPTROLLER, FOR EACH MONTH OF THE PRIOR CALENDAR YEAR:
(1) THE NUMBER OF NIGHTS EACH SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT IS
RENTED; AND
(2) THE NUMBER OF TIMES EACH HOME AMENITY IS RENTED.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DEVELOP A FORM FOR THE ANNUAL
REPORTING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND POST THE
FORM ON THE COMPTROLLER’S WEBSITE.
Article – Criminal Law
3–902.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Camera” includes any electronic device that can be used
surreptitiously to observe an individual.
(3) “Female breast” means a portion of the female breast below the top of
the areola.
(4) “HOME AMENITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) “Private area of an individual” means the naked or undergarment–clad
genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or female breast of an individual.
[(5)] (6) (i) “Private place” means a room in which a person can
reasonably be expected to fully or partially disrobe and has a reasonable expectation of
privacy, in:

HOUSE BILL 87 5
1. an office, business, or store;
2. a recreational facility;
3. a restaurant or tavern;
4. a hotel, motel, or other lodging facility;
5. a theater or sports arena;
6. a school or other educational institution;
7. a bank or other financial institution;
8. any part of a family child care home used for the care and
custody of a child; [or]
9. A HOME AMENITY OR SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT; OR
10. another place of public use or accommodation.
(ii) “Private place” includes a tanning room, dressing room, bedroom,
or restroom.
(7) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(6)] (8) (i) “Visual surveillance” means the deliberate, surreptitious
observation of an individual by any means.
(ii) “Visual surveillance” includes surveillance by:
1. direct sight;
2. the use of mirrors; or
3. the use of cameras.
(iii) “Visual surveillance” does not include a casual, momentary, or
unintentional observation of an individual.
(c) A person may not with prurient intent conduct or procure another to conduct
visual surveillance of:
(1) an individual in a private place without the consent of that individual;
or

HOUSE BILL 87
(2) the private area of an individual by use of a camera without the consent
of the individual under circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that the
private area of the individual would not be visible to the public, regardless of whether the
individual is in a public or private place.
10–201.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “HOME AMENITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) (i) “Public conveyance” means a conveyance to which the public or a
portion of the public has access to and a right to use for transportation.
(ii) “Public conveyance” includes an airplane, vessel, bus, railway
car, school vehicle, and subway car.
[(3)] (4) (i) “Public place” means a place to which the public or a
portion of the public has access and a right to resort for business, dwelling, entertainment,
or other lawful purpose.
(ii) “Public place” includes:
1. a restaurant, shop, shopping center, store, tavern, or other
place of business;
2. a public building;
3. a public parking lot;
4. a public street, sidewalk, or right–of–way;
5. a public park or other public grounds;
6. the common areas of a building containing four or more
separate dwelling units, including a corridor, elevator, lobby, and stairwell;
7. a hotel or motel;
8. a place used for public resort or amusement, including an
amusement park, golf course, race track, sports arena, swimming pool, and theater;
9. an institution of elementary, secondary, or higher
education;

HOUSE BILL 87 7
10. a place of public worship;
11. a place or building used for entering or exiting a public
conveyance, including an airport terminal, bus station, dock, railway station, subway
station, and wharf; [and]
12. A HOME AMENITY OR SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT;
AND
13. the parking areas, sidewalks, and other grounds and
structures that are part of a public place.
(5) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(c) (1) A person may not willfully and without lawful purpose obstruct or
hinder the free passage of another in a public place or on a public conveyance.
(5) A person from any location may not, by making an unreasonably loud
noise, willfully disturb the peace of another:
(i) on the other’s land or premises;
(ii) in a public place; or
(iii) on a public conveyance.
Article – Local Government
20–401.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Hotel” means:
(I) an establishment that offers sleeping accommodations for
compensation; OR
(II) A SHORT–TERM RENTAL PLATFORM.
(2) “Hotel” includes:
(i) an apartment;
(ii) a cottage;

HOUSE BILL 87
(iii) a hostelry;
(iv) an inn;
(v) a motel;
(vi) a rooming house;
(VII) A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT; or
[(vii)] (VIII) a tourist home.
(c) “Hotel rental tax” means the tax on a transient charge.
(D) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL PLATFORM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(E) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101
OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(d)] (F) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of
this paragraph, “transient charge” means a hotel charge for sleeping accommodations for a
period not exceeding 4 consecutive months.
(ii) In Carroll County, “transient charge” means a hotel charge for
sleeping accommodations for a period not exceeding 25 days.
(iii) In Frederick County, “transient charge” means a hotel charge for
sleeping accommodations for a period not exceeding 90 days.
(iv) In Garrett County and Washington County, “transient charge”
means a hotel charge for sleeping accommodations for a period not exceeding 30 days.
(2) “Transient charge” does not include any hotel charge for:
(i) services; or
(ii) accommodations other than sleeping accommodations.
[(e)] (G) “Western Maryland code county” means a code county in the Western
Maryland class as established under § 9–302 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.